apertium-fr-pt.pt.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!-- 05/XI/07
	 n. lemas: 10.820
	 cobertura: ~93%-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÃÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜàáâãäçèéêëìíîïñòóôõöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="pmp"/>
    <sdef n="infps"/>
    <sdef n="cuavb"/>
	<sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
	  <pardef n="numeros">
		  
      <e>
			  <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
			  <p>
				  <l/>
				  <r><s n="num"/></r>
			  </p>
		  </e>
		  
      <e>
			  <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
			  <p>
				  <l/>
				  <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
			  </p>
		  </e>
    </pardef>
  <pardef n="emails">
<e>
<re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
<p>
<l/>
<r><s n="num"/></r>
</p>
</e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="urls">
<e>
<re>((www.)[a-z\-]+[.][a-z]+)</re>
<p>
<l/>
<r><s n="num"/></r>
</p>
</e>
</pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <re>,</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__cuavb">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-íamos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ia</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-íeis</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ias</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-iam</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ia</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-emos</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ei</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-eis</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ás</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ão</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-á</l>
          <r>ar<s n="cuavb"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<!-- 2n mesoclítics, després de vocal -->
    <pardef n="S__gritar-me">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	 
	 <pardef n="S__gritar-se">
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l>-lhe</l>
			 <r>lhe<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
		 </p>
		 <par n="S__cuavb"/>
	 </e>
	 <e>
		 <p>
			 <l>-lhes</l>
			 <r>lhe<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
		 </p>
		 <par n="S__cuavb"/>
	 </e>
	 <e r="RL">
		 <p>
			 <l>-me</l>
			 <r>me<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
		 </p>
		 <par n="S__cuavb"/>
	 </e>
	 <e r="RL">
		 <p>
			 <l>-te</l>
			 <r>te<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
		 </p>
		 <par n="S__cuavb"/>
	 </e>
	 <e r="RL">
		 <p>
			 <l>-nos</l>
			 <r>nos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
		 </p>
		 <par n="S__cuavb"/>
	 </e>
	 <e r="RL">
		 <p>
			 <l>-vos</l>
			 <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
		 </p>
		 <par n="S__cuavb"/>
	 </e>
    </pardef>
	 <!-- 2n mesoclítics, després de s: o, a, os, as -->
    <pardef n="S__gritar-mos">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-las</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-la</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-los</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-lo</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-lo</l>
          <r>o<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cuavb"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="">
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="">
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="">
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="">
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="">
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="">
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="">
        <par n="emails"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="">
	<par n="urls"/>
      </e>
